Utah statutes.
72-1-302.   Commission offices and meetings.

(1)  The commission shall maintain offices and hold regular meetings at those offices on dates fixed and formally announced by it, and may hold other meetings at the times and places as it may, by order, provide.

(2) (a)  Meetings may be held upon call of the governor, the chairman, or two commissioners upon notice of the time, place, and purpose of meeting to each commissioner at least seven days prior to the date of the meeting.

(b)  Any meeting may be held upon shorter notice with the unanimous approval of the commission.

